Missouri, session 2026, SB1144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 182.291, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 182.291,
to read as follows:
182.291. 1. After the establishment of a county
library district as provided in section 182.010, the board
of trustees of any city library within the county, which
city has a library tax levy equal to that levied for the
county library district, and which county library district
has a population of under two hundred and fifty thousand,
with the prior approval of the governing body of the city,
may petition the county governing body to permit the
organization of a city-county library to provide library
service to the residents of the county by appropriate means
from the city library.
2. After the county library board has been appointed
as provided in section 182.050, the county library board may
petition the county governing body to permit the
organization of a city-county library which shall provide
library service to the residents of the county by
appropriate means from the city library. Within thirty days
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1144 2
after receiving the petition the county governing body shall
notify the county library board and the city library board
of its decision by order of record. If the petition is
approved, the city-county library shall be deemed
established; but if the petition is denied, the parties may
proceed as provided in sections 182.010 to 182.120.
3. (1) The city-county library shall be under the
control and supervision of a board of trustees of nine
members[.] appointed as follows:
(a) If the population of the county is larger than
that of the city, the county governing body shall appoint
five members of the library board[.];
(b) If the population of the county is less than that
of the city, the county governing body shall appoint four
members of the library board[.];
(c) If the population of the city is larger than that
of the county, the mayor of the city shall appoint five
members to the library board[.];
(d) If the population of the city is less than that of
the county[,]:
a. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b. of
this paragraph, the mayor shall appoint four members to the
library board; and
b. In any county with more than four hundred thousand
but fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants, for
members appointed on or after January 1, 2027, the mayors of
the four most populous cities in the county shall appoint
four members to the library board as follows:
(i) The member's term that expires first after January
1, 2027, shall be filled by an appointment by the mayor of
the most populous city in the county;

SB 1144 3
(ii) The member's term that expires second after
January 1, 2027, shall be filled by an appointment by the
mayor of the second-most populous city in the county;
(iii) The member's term that expires third after
January 1, 2027, shall be filled by an appointment by the
mayor of the third-most populous city in the county; and
(iv) The member's term that expires fourth after
January 1, 2027, shall be filled by an appointment by the
mayor of the fourth-most populous city in the county.
(2) (a) After the initial appointments made by
following the order of appointments described in
subparagraph b. of paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, subsequent appointments shall be made by
following the same order.
(b) The population of the cities described in
subparagraph b. of paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be determined on the basis of the last
previous decennial census of the United States as provided
in section 1.100.
(3) The members shall serve a term of three years and
until their successors are appointed and qualified in the
same manner as their predecessors; except that, the original
members shall serve terms ranging from one to three years to
be determined by the board at its first meeting.
Immediately upon their appointment, the board shall organize
as provided in section 182.060; and thereupon the city board
shall cease to exist and shall turn over all property, books
and records to the city-county board.
4. All unexpended funds of the preexisting separate
city and county library districts shall be deposited by the
custodians thereof with the city treasurer immediately upon

SB 1144 4
the issuance of the county governing body's approval of the
petition.
5. For all tax purposes, including levies and
adjustments thereof, the city library district shall become
a part of the county library district at the beginning of
the next fiscal year after the merger and the property
within the city library district shall be treated as within
the county library district for all such purposes; except,
until the city library district shall become a part of the
county library district the levy and collection of taxes
shall be made as though no merger had taken place, so that
the levy and collection of taxes shall be without
interruption, and during that period no change in the levy
shall take place. The funds collected shall be turned over
to the city treasurer immediately upon collection.
6. All of the real and personal property and all of
the obligations of the preexisting separate city and county
library districts shall, without further action, become the
property and obligations of the merged city-county library
district, which shall have an official name composed of the
100 name of the city, followed by the name of the county and
101 followed by the words "County Library District".
102 7. The merged district, and the librarian, officials
103 and board thereof, shall have all of the rights, powers,
104 responsibilities, and privileges granted county library
105 districts by the laws of the state of Missouri and shall be
106 governed by such laws, as though the merged districts were a
107 county library district, except:
108 (1) Where such laws are inconsistent with this section;
109 (2) The treasurer of the board of trustees of the
110 library district shall receive and be the custodian of all
111 moneys, belonging to the district from whatever source

SB 1144 5
112 derived. Such funds shall be audited annually. At least
113 once in every month the proper finance officer shall pay
114 over to the treasurer of the library district all moneys
115 received and collected for the fund, including interest on
116 such moneys, and take duplicate receipts from the treasurer,
117 one of which he shall file with the secretary of the library
118 district and the other of which he shall file in his
119 settlement with the proper governing body;
120 (3) The library board shall prepare a budget for each
121 fiscal year and all expenditures shall conform to such
122 budget. The budget shall be prepared and approved by the
123 library board and made available to the members of the
124 governing body of the city and the members of the county
125 governing body sixty days before the beginning of each
126 fiscal year, except the first budget of the merged district
127 shall be prepared forthwith and so delivered after the
128 merger.
✓